Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.130

Copy of judgment to inferior tribunal, board, or officer.

A copy of the judgment signed by the clerk, must be transmitted to the inferior tribunal, board or officer having the custody of the record or proceeding certified up.

[ 1895 c 65 s 13; RRS s 1011.]